Utah statutes.
32B-12-206.   Bond for liquor warehousing license.

(1) (a)  A liquor warehouser licensee shall post a cash bond or surety bond in the penal sum of $10,000 payable to the department.

(b)  A liquor warehouser licensee shall procure and maintain the bond required by this section for as long as the liquor warehouser licensee continues to operate as a liquor warehouser licensee.

(2)  A bond posted under this section shall be:

(a)  in a form approved by the attorney general; and

(b)  conditioned upon the liquor warehouser licensee's faithful compliance with this title and the rules of the commission.

(3)  If a surety bond posted by a liquor warehouser licensee under this section is canceled due to a liquor warehouser licensee's negligence, the department may assess a $300 reinstatement fee.

(4)  No part of a bond posted under this section may be withdrawn during the period the liquor warehousing license is in effect.

(5) (a)  A bond posted by a liquor warehouser licensee may be forfeited if the liquor warehousing license is revoked.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), the department may make a claim against a bond posted by a liquor warehouser licensee for money owed the department under this title without the commission first revoking the liquor warehousing license.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

